apertium-tr-ky.ky.twol
Alphabet
А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И И К Л М Н Ң О Ө П Р С Т У Ү Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ь Ы Ъ Э Ю Я
а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н ң о ө п р с т у ү ф х ц ч ш щ ь ы ъ э ю я
%{G%}:г %{D%}:д %{N%}:н %{L%}:л %{B%}:б %{P%}:п %{S%}:с %{n%}:н %{l%}:л
%{A%}:а %{I%}:ы %{U%}:у %{E%}:а %{e%}:0
%>:0 ; 

Sets

!%{G%}       ! Realised as 'г', 'к', 'ң', 'н'
!%{D%}       ! Realised as 'д', 'т', 'н'
!%{N%}       ! Realised as 'н', 'д', 'т'
!%{L%}       ! Realised as 'л', 'д', 'т'

Cns = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ь Ъ 
      б в г д ж з й к л м н ң п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ь ъ 
      %{D%} %{G%} %{N%} %{L%} %{B%} %{S%} %{n%} %{l%} ;
      !%{D%} %{G%} %{N%} %{L%} %{B%} %{P%} %{S%} %{n%} ;

SurCns = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ь Ъ 
         б в г д ж з й к л м н ң п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ь ъ ;

FromCns = SurCns Я я Ё ё Ю ю ;

!CnsNoY = Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ь Ъ 
!         б в г д ж з к л м н ң п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ь ъ 
!         %{D%} %{G%} %{N%} %{L%} %{B%} %{S%} %{n%} %{l%} ;

!CorVs =     [all:V | all:Cons]* ;


!%{E%}       ! Realised as 'а', 'е', 'о', 'ө', 'й' 
!%{A%}       ! Realised as 'а', 'е', 'о', 'ө' 
!%{I%}       ! Realised as 'ы', 'и', 'у', 'ү'
!%{U%}       ! Realised as 'у', 'ү'
!%{y%}       ! Realised as '', 'ы', 'и', 'у', 'ү'

Vow =     А Е Ё И О Ө У Ү Ы Э Ю Я
          а е ё и о ө у ү ы э ю я 
          %{A%} %{I%} %{U%} %{E%} %{y%} ;

SurVow = А Е Ё И О Ө У Ү Ы Э Ю Я
         а е ё и о ө у ү ы э ю я ; 

FrontVow = И Ө Е Ү Э и ө ү э е ;
BackVow = А О У Ы а о у ы Я я Ю ю ;
FrontUnrndVow = И Е Э и э е ; 
BackUnrndVow = А Ы а ы Я я ;
FrontRndVow = Ө Ү ө ү ;
BackRndVow =  О У о у Ю ю Ё ё ;
BackLowRndVow = О о Ё ё ;
LowVow = Е е Э э Ө ө А а Я я О о Ё ё ; ! АА аа ЭЭ ээ ӨӨ өө ОО оо ;
HighVow = И и Ү ү Ы ы У у Ю ю ;
YotVow = Я я Е е Ё ё Ю ю ;

NasalCns = м н ң
           М Н Ң ;

LabialCns = б п м
            Б П М ;

UnvoicedNonSonCns = К П С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ  
	                к п с т ф х ц ч ш щ ;

VoicedCns = Б В Г Д Ж З Л М Н Ң Й Р
            б в г д ж з л м н ң й р ;

VoicedLowSonCns = Б В Г Д Ж З Л М Н Ң
                  б в г д ж з л м н ң ;

! These three sets include the suffix border, and accounts for long-distance VH
CnsFrontUnrndVowSB = Cns FrontUnrndVow %> ;
CnsFrontRndVowSB = Cns FrontRndVow %> ;
CnsBackRndVowSB = Cns BackRndVow %> ;

! These sets do not continue suffix borders.
CnsFrontUnrndVow = Cns FrontUnrndVow %{I%} %{A%} %{U%} %{E%} ;
CnsFrontRndVow = Cns FrontRndVow  %{I%} %{A%} %{U%} %{E%} ;
CnsBackRndVow = Cns BackRndVow  %{I%} %{A%} %{U%} %{E%} ;
CnsBackLowRndVow = Cns BackLowRndVow  %{I%} %{A%} %{U%} %{E%} ;

NotVowel = Cns %> ; 

Wild = Cns SurVowel %> 0 ;
WildNoVow = Cns %> 0 ;
WildNonPhon = %> 0 ;
!WildNoVowNoY = [ Cns - й ] %> 0 ;


Rules

!!!!!!!!!!!!!   Rules that work and don't bother anything !!!!!!!!!!!

"Soft sign deletion before suffix"
ь:0 <=> _ %>: ;

"/n/ deletion in px3 nominative"
%{n%}:0 <=> _ .#. ;

"{E} turns to й after a vowel"
%{E%}:й <=> :SurVow %>: _ ;

"L Desonorisation"
%{L%}:д <=> VoicedLowSonCns %>: _ ;

"N Desonorisation"
%{N%}:д <=> VoicedCns %>: _ ;
!%{N%}:д <=> VoicedCns (%>:) _ ;
!!%{N%}:д <=> [ SonCns | VoicedNonSonCns ] %>:  _ ;

!!!!!! рн stuff !!!!! 

"Unepenthesis in рн stems"
%{y%}:0 <=> _ [ :Cns :SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;

"Harmony of epenthesised vowel in рн stems"
!%{y%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* :Cns ]/[:0] _ [ :Cns \:SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>:] ;
%{y%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* :Cns ]/[:0] _ [ :Cns [ .#. | :Cns ] ]/[ :0 | %>:] ;
  where  Vy  in  (  и  ү  и  и  ү  ы  ы  у  у  ы  у  у )
  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
           matched ;

"Desonorisation of н when no vowel epenthesised"
н:д <=> р %{y%}:0 _ ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!   Rules that might be messing with me !!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Devoicing of stops etc. across morpheme boundary after voiceless consonants" !!"Katkalan harmony in consonants"
!Cx:Cy <=>  :UnvoicedNonSonCns %>: _ ;   !Cx:Cy <=>  UnvoicedNonSonCns %>: _ ;
!Cx:Cy <=>  [ :UnvoicedNonSonCns ]/[ [ :0 - %{n%}:0 ] | %>: ] _ [ ? -[ %{I%}:0 р:0 ] ] ;
Cx:Cy <=>  [ :UnvoicedNonSonCns ]/[ [ :0 - %{n%}:0 ] | %>: ] _ \[ %{I%}: р: ] ;
!Cx:Cy <=>  [ :UnvoicedNonSonCns ]/[ [ :0 - %{n%}:0 ] | %>: ] _ ;
!Cx:Cy <=>  [ :UnvoicedNonSonCns ]/[ [ :0 - %{n%}:0 ] ] ( %>: ) _ ;
        where Cx in ( %{B%}  %{G%}  %{D%}  %{L%}  %{N%} )
              Cy in (   п      к      т      т      т)
              matched;



!!!!!!!!!!!!   Consonant stuff  !!!!!!!!!!!!!

!"Voiceless non-coronal stop voicing"
!!Cx:Cy <=> :SurVow _ %>: (:0) :SurVow \п ; 
!!Cx:Cy <=> :SurVow _ WildNonPhon* :SurVow ;
!!Cx:Cy <=> :SurVow _ [ WildNonPhon: | :WildNonPhon ]* :SurVow ;
!!Cx:Cy <=> :SurVow _ %>: (:0) :SurVow \п ; 
!Cx:Cy <=> :SurVow _ %>: [ :SurVow ]/[ :0 ] \п ; 
!        where Cx in (  п   к  )
!              Cy in (  б   г  )
!              matched ;

"Intervocalic voicing of п everywhere except in <cv_perf>"
!п:б <=> :SurVow _ %>: [ :SurVow ]/[ :0 ] \[ п ] ; 
!п:б <=> :SurVow _ %>: [ [ [ :SurVow ]/[ :0 ] ] - [ %{I%}: п ] ] ;
!п:б <=> :SurVow _ %>: [ [ (:0) :SurVow ] - $[ %{I%}: п ] ] ;
!п:б <=> :SurVow _ %>: [ [ (:0) :SurVow ] - [ %{I%}: п ] ] ;
!!п:б <=> :SurVow (:0) _ %>: (:0) [ :SurVow - %{I%}:LowVow ] ;
!п:б <=> :SurVow (:0) _ %>: (:0) :SurVow ;
!!п:б => :SurVow (:0) _ %>: (:0) :SurVow ;
!п:б <= :SurVow (:0) _ %>: (:0) :SurVow ;
!п:б <=> [ [ :SurVow :* ] - [ :LowVow :* ] ] (:0) _ %>: (:0) [ [ :* :SurVow ] - [ :* %{I%}: п [ :Cns | .#. ] ] ] ;
!п:б <=> [ [ :SurVow :* ] - [ :LowVow :* ] ] (:0) _ %>: (:0) [ [ :* :SurVow ] - [ :* %{I%}: п ] ] ;
!п:б <=> [ [ :SurVow :* ] - [ :LowVow :* ] ] (:0) _ %>: (:0) [ [ :* :SurVow ] - [ :* %{I%}: п ] ] ;
!п:б <=> [ [ :SurVow :* ] - [ :LowVow :* ] ] (:0) _ %>: (:0) [ :* - [ :* :SurVow ] ] ;
!п:б <=> :SurVow (:0) _ %>:  [(:0) :SurVow - [:* %{I%}: п ]] ;
!п:б <=> [:SurVow (:0) _ %>: (:0) :SurVow - [:LowVow _ %>: %{I%}: п ]] ;
!п:б <=> [[:SurVow (:0)] - [:LowVow ]] _ %>: [(:0) :SurVow - [%{I%}: п ]] ;
!п:б <=> [:SurVow - :LowVow ] (:0) _ %>: (:0) [ :SurVow - [ %{I%}: п ]] ;
!п:б <=> :SurVow (:0) _ %>: (:0) [ :SurVow - [ %{I%}: п ]] ;
!п:б <=> [:SurVow (:0) - [:LowVow (:0)]] _ %>: (:0) [:SurVow - [%{I%}: ]] \п ;
!п:б <=> [:SurVow (:0) - [:LowVow (:0)]] _ %>: [[(:0) :SurVow] - [%{I%}: ]] \п ;
!п:б <=> :HighVow (:0) _ %>: (:0) [ [:SurVow - %{I%}:] [:* - п]* | %{I%}: ] .#. ;
!        :HighVow (:0) _ %>: (:0) :SurVow ;
!        :SurVow (:0)  _ %>: (:0) [ [:SurVow - %{I%}:] [:* - п]* | %{I%}: ] .#. ;
!п:б <=> :HighVow _ %>: [ [:SurVow - %{I%}:] [:* - п]* | %{I%}: ]/[ :0 ] .#. ;
!        :HighVow _ %>: :SurVow/:0 ;
!        :SurVow  _ %>: [ [ [:SurVow - %{I%}:] [:* - п] ]* | %{I%}: ]/[ :0 ] .#. ;
п:б <=> :HighVow _ %>: [ [:SurVow - %{I%}:] [:* - п]* | %{I%}: ]/[ :0 ] ;
        :HighVow _ %>: :SurVow/:0 ;
        :SurVow  _ %>: [ [ [:SurVow - %{I%}:] [:* - п] ] | %{I%}: ]/[ :0 ] ;




!"restrict п voicing rule to everything but {I}п"
!п:б /<= :LowVow _ %>: %{I%}: п ;

"Intervocalic voicing of к everywhere"
к:г <=> :SurVow _ %>: [ :SurVow ]/[ :0 ] ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!   Deletion   !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!"Vowel deletion for archiphoneme {I}"
!!%{I%}:0 <=> :SurVow (%>:) _ \п ;
!!%{I%}:0 <=> :SurVow (%>:) _ ;
!!%{I%}:0 <=> :SurVow WildNonPhon* _ ;
!!%{I%}:0 <=> :SurVow [ WildNonPhon: | :WildNonPhon ]* _ ;
!!%{I%}:0 <=> :SurVow (%>:) _ \п ;
!!%{I%}:0 <=> :SurVow (%>:) _ ;
!!%{I%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow ]/[ [ :0 - й:0 ] | %>: ] _ \п ;
!!%{I%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow ]/[ [ :0 - й:0 ] | %>: ] _ \[ п | .#. ] ;
!!%{I%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow | %{n%}:н ]/[ [ :0 - й:0 ] | %>: ] _ \[ п ] ;
!!%{I%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow | %{n%}:н ]/[ [ :0 - й:0 ] | %>: | %{N%}:0 ] _ \[ п ] ;
!!%{I%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow ]/[ [ :0 - й:0 ] | %>: ] _ \[ п ] ;
!%{I%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow ]/[ [ :0 - й:0 ] | %>: ] _ \[ п | р:0 ] ;

"Deletion of {I} after vowels"
%{I%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
                 ~~[ й:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ]~~ ;     ! Avoid conflict w y-vowels
                                 ~~[ _ п ]~~ ;   ! Avoid conflict w {I}п stuff
                                 ~~[ _ р:0 ]~~ ; ! Avoid conflict w causative
             ~~[ %{e%}:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ]~~ ;     ! Avoid conflict w irreg vowel harm

!"Deletion of {I} after {n}"
!%{I%}:0 <=> %{n%}:н/[ [ :0 - %{e%}: ] | %>: ] _ \[ п ];

"Deletion of {I} after {n}"
%{I%}:0 <=> %{n%}:н/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
                             ~~[ _ п ]~~ ;   ! Avoid conflict w {I}п stuff
                             ~~[ _ р:0 ]~~ ; ! Avoid conflict w causative
         ~~[ %{e%}:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ]~~ ;     ! Avoid conflict w irreg vowel harm

!"Deletion of {A} after vowels"
!!%{A%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow - й: ]/[ :0 ] %>: _ ;
!!%{A%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow ]/[ :0 - й:0 ] %>: _ ;
!!%{A%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow ]/[ :0 ] \й: %>: _ ;
!!%{A%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow ]/[ :0 - й: ] %>: _ ;
!%{A%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow - %{A%}: ]/[ [ :0 - й:0 ] | %>: ] _ ;

"Deletion of {A} after vowels"
%{A%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
             ~~[ %{A%}:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ]~~ ;  ! Avoid conflict with ??? FIXME
                 ~~[ й:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ]~~ ;  ! Avoid conflict w y-vowels

"Deletion of {S} after a consonant"
!%{S%}:0 <=> :Cns :0* (%>:) _ ;
!%{S%}:0 <=> :Cns WildNonPhon* _ ;
!%{S%}:0 <=> :Cns [ WildNonPhon: | :WildNonPhon ]* _ ;
!%{S%}:0 <=> :Cns :0* (%>:) _ ;
!%{S%}:0 <=> :Cns/[ :0 | %>: ]* _ ;
!%{S%}:0 <=> :Cns/[ %>: ]* _ ;
!%{S%}:0 <=> :FromCns/[ %>: ]* _ ;
%{S%}:0 <=> [ :Cns | й: | ь:0 ]/[ %>: ]* _ ;




!!!!!!!!!!!!   Vowel harmony !!!!!!!!!!!!!

!"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
!!%{A%}:Vy <=> :LastVowel [ WildNoVow: | :WildNoVow ]* :SurCns [ WildNonPhon: | :WildNonPhon ]* _ [ ? - [ {U}: ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ] ;
!!%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ Cns - й: ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ \%{U%}:* ;
!!%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ Cns - й: ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ [ ? - [ %>: %{U%}: ] ] ;
!!%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ Cns - й: ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ \[ [ %{U%}: ] | [ %>: %{U%}: ] ] ;
!!%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ Cns - й: ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ( %>: ) \[ %{U%}:0 | %{U%}:SurVow ] ;
!!%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ Cns - й: ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ \[ ( %>: ) %{U%}: ] ;
!!%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ Cns - й: ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ [ ?* -  [ [ %{U%}: ?* ] | [ %>: %{U%}: ?* ] ] ] ;
!!%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ Cns - й: ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ [ ?* -  [ ( %>: ) %{U%}: ?* ] ] ;
!!				 \%{B%}:б _ \%{U%}: ;
!!				 \%{B%}:б _ \[ %>: %{U%}: ] ;
!!%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ Cns - й: ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ \[ %{U%}: ?* ] ;
!!             [ :LastVowel Cns* [ Cns - й: ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ \[ %>: %{U%}: ?* ] ;
!!             [ :LastVowel Cns* [ Cns - й: ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ \[ %{U%}:SurVow ?* ] ;
!!             [ :LastVowel Cns* [ Cns - й: ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ \[ %>: %{U%}:SurVow ?* ] ;
!!%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ Cns - й: ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ [ [ [ ( ? ) ? ] - [ ( %>: ) %{U%}: ] ] | ? .#. | .#. ] ;
!!%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ Cns - й: ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ( %>: ) \[ %>: | %{U%}: ] ;
!%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* [ :Cns - й: ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ( %>: ) \[ %>: | %{U%}: ] ;
!             [ %{A%}:LastVowel ] _ ( %>: ) \[ %>: | %{U%}: ] ;
!        where LastVowel in (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у  )
!                     Vy in (  е  ө  е  е  ө  а  а  о  о  а  а  а  )
!							matched ;

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
%{A%}:Vy  <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* :Cns ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
                                 [ %{A%}:LastVowel ] _  ;
                                                 ~~[ _ ( %>: ) %{U%}: ]~~ ;
                      ~~[ :LastVowel й:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ]~~ ;
        where LastVowel in (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у  )
                     Vy in (  е  ө  е  е  ө  а  а  о  о  а  а  а  )
                     matched ;
